Idaho statutes. Title 16 JUVENILE PROCEEDINGS
Chapter 15 ADOPTION OF CHILDREN
§ 16-1513. Registration of notice and filing of paternity proceedings.

A person who is the father or claims to be the father of a child born out of wedlock may claim rights pertaining to his paternity of the child by commencing proceedings to establish paternity under section 7-1111, Idaho Code, and by filing with the vital statistics unit of the department of health and welfare notice of his filing of proceedings to establish his paternity of the child born out of wedlock. The vital statistics unit of the department of health and welfare shall provide forms for the purpose of filing the notice of filing of paternity proceedings, and the forms shall be made available through the vital statistics unit of the Idaho department of health and welfare and in the office of the county clerk in every county of this state. The forms shall include a written notification that filing pursuant to this section shall not satisfy the requirements of chapter 82, title 39, Idaho Code, and the notification shall also include the following statements:

A parent may make a claim of parental rights of an abandoned child, abandoned pursuant to the provisions of chapter 82, title 39, Idaho Code, as provided by section 39-8206, Idaho Code, by filing a notice of claim of parental rights with the vital statistics unit of the department of health and welfare on a form as prescribed and provided by the vital statistics unit of the department of health and welfare;

The vital statistics unit of the department of health and welfare shall maintain a separate registry for claims to abandoned children, abandoned pursuant to the provisions of chapter 82, title 39, Idaho Code;

The department shall provide forms for the purpose of filing a claim of parental rights of an abandoned child, abandoned pursuant to the provisions of chapter 82, title 39, Idaho Code, and the forms shall be made available through the vital statistics unit of the Idaho department of health and welfare and in the office of the county clerk in every county of this state;

To be valid, a claim of parental rights of an abandoned child, abandoned pursuant to the provisions of chapter 82, title 39, Idaho Code, must be filed before an order terminating parental rights is entered by the court. A parent that fails to file a claim of parental rights prior to entry of an order terminating their parental rights is deemed to have abandoned the child and waived and surrendered any right in relation to the child, including the right to notice of any judicial proceeding in connection with the termination of parental rights or adoption of the child;

Registration of notice of filing of paternity proceedings pursuant to chapter 15, title 16, Idaho Code, shall not satisfy the requirements of chapter 82, title 39, Idaho Code. To register a parental claim to an abandoned child, abandoned pursuant to the provisions of chapter 82, title 39, Idaho Code, an individual must file an abandoned child registry claim with the vital statistics unit of the department of health and welfare and comply with all other provisions of chapter 82, title 39, Idaho Code, in the time and manner prescribed, in order to preserve parental rights to the child.

The notice of the filing of paternity proceedings may be filed prior to the birth of the child, but must be filed prior to the date of the filing of any proceeding to terminate the parental rights of the birth mother. The notice of the filing of paternity proceedings shall be signed by the person filing the notice and shall include his name and address, the name and last address of the mother, and either the birth date of the child or the probable month and year of the expected birth of the child. The vital statistics unit of the department of health and welfare shall maintain a central registry for this purpose that shall be subject to disclosure according to chapter 1, title 74, Idaho Code. The department shall record the date and time the notice of the filing of proceedings is filed with the department. The notice shall be deemed to be duly filed with the department as of the date and time recorded on the notice by the department.

If the unmarried biological father does not know the county in which the birth mother resides, he may initiate his action in any county, subject to a change in venue.

Except as provided in section 16-1504(6), Idaho Code, any father of a child born out of wedlock who fails to file and register his notice of the commencement of paternity proceedings pursuant to section 7-1111, Idaho Code, prior to the date of the filing of any proceeding to terminate the parental rights of the birth mother; the filing of any proceeding to adopt the child; or the execution of a consent to terminate the birth mother’s parental rights under the provisions of section 16-2005(4), Idaho Code, whichever occurs first, is deemed to have waived and surrendered any right in relation to the child and of any notice to proceedings for adoption of the child or for termination of parental rights of the birth mother. His consent to the adoption of the child shall not be required and he shall be barred from thereafter bringing or maintaining any action to establish his paternity of the child. Failure of such filing or registration shall constitute an abandonment of said child and shall constitute an irrevocable implied consent in any adoption or termination proceeding.

The filing and registration of an unrevoked notice of the commencement of paternity proceedings by a putative father shall constitute prima facie evidence of the fact of his paternity in any contested proceeding under chapter 11, title 7, Idaho Code. The filing of a notice of the commencement of paternity proceedings shall not be a bar to an action for termination of his parental rights under chapter 20, title 16, Idaho Code.

An unmarried biological father of a child born out of wedlock who has filed and registered a notice of the filing of paternity proceedings may at any time revoke notice of intent to claim paternity previously filed. Upon receipt of written revocation, the effect shall be as if no notice of the filing of paternity proceedings had been filed or registered.

In any adoption proceeding pertaining to a child born out of wedlock, if there is no showing that the putative father has consented to the adoption, a certificate shall be obtained from the vital statistics unit of the department of health and welfare, signed by the state registrar of vital statistics, which certificate shall state that a diligent search has been made of the registry of notices from putative fathers, and that no filing has been found pertaining to the father of the child in question, or if a filing is found, stating the name of the putative father and the time and date of filing. That certificate shall be filed with the court prior to entry of a final decree of adoption.

Identities of putative fathers can only be released pursuant to procedures contained in chapter 1, title 74, Idaho Code.
(9) To cover the cost of implementing and maintaining said central registry, the vital statistics unit of the department of health and welfare shall charge a filing fee of ten dollars ($10.00) at the time the putative father files his notice of his commencement of proceedings. The department shall also charge a reasonable fee to cover all costs incurred in a search of the Idaho putative father registry and for furnishing a certificate in accordance with the provisions of this section and section 16-1504, Idaho Code. It is the intent of the legislature that the fee shall cover all direct and indirect costs incurred pursuant to this section and section 16-1504, Idaho Code. The department shall annually review the fees and expenses incurred pursuant to administering the provisions of this section and section 16-1504, Idaho Code.

Where to obtain a registration form;

Where to register;

The procedures to follow in order to file proceedings to establish paternity of a child born out of wedlock;

The consequences of a voluntary acknowledgment of paternity; and

The consequences of failure to acknowledge paternity.

When filing a notice of the filing of paternity proceedings, a person who claims to be the father of a child born out of wedlock shall file with the vital statistics unit of the department of health and welfare the completed form prescribed by the vital statistics unit of the department of health and welfare. Said form will be filled out completely, signed by the person claiming paternity, and witnessed before a notary public.

(10) Consistent with its authority denoted in the vital statistics act, section 39-242(c), Idaho Code, the board of health and welfare shall adopt, amend and repeal rules for the purpose of carrying out the provisions of this section.

(11) The department shall produce and distribute, within the limits of continuing annual appropriations duly made available to the department by the legislature for such purposes, a pamphlet or publication informing the public about the Idaho putative father registry, printed in English and Spanish. The pamphlet shall indicate the procedures to be followed in order to receive notice of any proceeding for the adoption of a child that an unmarried biological father claims to have fathered and of any proceeding for termination of his parental rights, voluntary acknowledgment of paternity, the consequences of acknowledgment of paternity, the consequences of failure to acknowledge paternity and the address of the Idaho putative father registry. Within the limits of continuing annual appropriations duly made available to the department by the legislature for such purposes, such pamphlets or publications shall be made available for distribution to the public at all offices of the department of health and welfare. Upon request, the department shall also provide such pamphlets or publications to hospitals, libraries, medical clinics, schools, colleges, universities, providers of child-related services and children’s agencies licensed in the state of Idaho or advertising services in the state of Idaho.

(12) Within the limits of continuing annual appropriations duly made available to the department by the legislature for such purposes, each county clerk, branch office of the department of motor vehicles, all offices of the department of health and welfare, hospitals and local health districts shall post in a conspicuous place a notice that informs the public about the purpose and operation of the Idaho putative father registry. The notice must include information regarding the following:

(13) The department shall host on the department’s web page a public service announcement (PSA) informing the public about the Idaho putative father registry, printed in English and Spanish. The PSA shall indicate the procedures to be followed in order to receive notice of any proceeding for the adoption of a child that an unmarried biological father claims to have fathered and of any proceeding for termination of his parental rights, voluntary acknowledgment of paternity, the consequences of acknowledgment of paternity, the consequences of failure to acknowledge paternity and the address of the Idaho putative father registry.

(14) Failure to post a proper notice under the provisions of this section does not relieve a putative father of the obligation to file notice of the filing of proceedings to establish his paternity pursuant to this section or to commence proceedings to establish paternity pursuant to section 7-1111, Idaho Code, prior to the filing of any proceeding to terminate parental rights of the birth mother.

(15) A person who knowingly or intentionally falsely files or registers as a putative father is guilty of a misdemeanor.

§ 16-1514. Petition for adoption of foreign born child.

Proceedings to adopt a foreign born child who has been allowed to enter the United States for the purpose of adoption shall be commenced by the filing of a petition under this section. A petition under this section shall be initiated by the person or persons proposing to adopt the child and shall be filed with the district court of the judicial district in which said person or persons reside. The petitioner shall have resided and maintained a dwelling within the state of Idaho for at least six (6) consecutive months prior to the filing of a petition. The petition shall set forth the following:

The name and address of the petitioner or petitioners;

The name of the child proposed to be adopted and the name by which he or she shall be known when adopted;

The degree of relationship of the child, if any, to the petitioner or petitioners;

The child’s country of origin, and date of birth, if known;

That the child has been issued a visa or other document authorizing entry into the United States as an immigrant or for the purpose of adoption or for humanitarian reasons relating to adoption in the United States and the date of the person’s entry into the United States;

That a home study of the petitioner or petitioners was prepared and the name of the person or agency performing the home study. A copy of the home study shall be attached to the petition;

That, to the information and belief of the petitioners, the biological parents of the child to be adopted are residents of another country;

That the adoption of such child is in the child’s best interests.

At the time fixed for the hearing on a petition for adoption under this section, the person or persons adopting the child and the child to be adopted must appear before the court where the petition was filed. The judge shall examine the petitioner or petitioners at the hearing and, if satisfied that the proposed adoption is in the best interests of the child to be adopted, shall enter a decree of adoption. The petitioner or petitioners shall at such time execute an agreement to the effect that the child shall be adopted and treated in all respects as the petitioner’s own lawful child.

This section governs the adoption of all foreign born children who have entered the United States to be adopted. Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, no consent shall be required from the biological parents of the child to be adopted if the child has been granted permission by the United States department of state or United States department of homeland security to enter the United States for the purpose of adoption or for humanitarian reasons relating to adoption by United States citizens. A visa or other document from the United States department of state or United States department of homeland security authorizing entry into the United States for the purpose of adoption, or for humanitarian reasons relating to adoption by United States citizens, shall be deemed conclusive evidence of the termination of the parental rights of the biological parents and compliance with the laws of the country of the child’s birth. The provisions of chapter 20, title 16, Idaho Code, shall not apply to adoptions under this section.
(4) The decisions and orders of foreign courts and government agencies, authorized to approve adoptions, shall be accorded judicial comity or the same full faith and credit accorded a judgment of a sister state without additional proceedings or documentation, provided the United States department of state or United States department of homeland security has allowed the child to enter the United States as set forth in subsection (3) of this section.

§ 16-1514A. International adoption.

When an Idaho resident adopts a child in a foreign country in accordance with the laws of the foreign country, and such adoption is recognized as full and final by the United States government, such resident may file with a petition a copy of the decree, order or certificate of adoption which evidences finalization of the adoption in the foreign country, together with a certified translation thereof if it is not in English, and proof of full and final adoption from the United States government with the clerk of the court of any county in this state having jurisdiction over the person or persons filing such documents.

The court shall assign a docket number and file and enter the documents referenced in subsection (1) of this section with an order recognizing the foreign adoption without the necessity of a hearing. Such order, along with the final decree, order or certificate from the foreign country shall have the same force and effect as if a final order of adoption were granted in accordance with the provisions of this chapter.

When such order is filed and entered, the adoptive parents may request a report of adoption as provided in section 39-259, Idaho Code.

§ 16-1515. Revocation of adoption — Payment of expenses of adoptive parents.

If a natural parent withdraws or revokes a consent to adoption and the court orders that the custody of the child be returned to the natural parent upon the petition of a natural parent, whether or not the order of adoption has been entered, the court shall order the natural parent who so petitioned to reimburse the adoptive or prospective adoptive parents for all adoption expenses including, but not limited to, all medical fees and costs and all legal fees and costs, and all other reasonable costs and expenses including, but not limited to, expenses for food and clothing incurred by the adoptive or prospective adoptive parents in connection with the care and maintenance of the child while the child was living with the adoptive or prospective adoptive parents. The court shall determine the amount of the reimbursement owing and shall enter the same as a money judgment in favor of the adoptive or prospective adoptive parents.

If the natural parent agrees to consent to the adoption and the adoption proceedings have been initiated by the prospective adoptive parents in accordance with that agreement but the natural parent thereafter refuses to execute the consent to adoption, the prospective adoptive parents may file a motion for restitution in the adoption action and the court may order reimbursement as provided in subsection (1) of this section, or the prospective adoptive parents may file a suit independent of the adoption proceedings for damages which may include those items described in subsection (1) of this section.

For purposes of this section, “prospective adoptive parents” shall include foster parents who have initiated adoption proceedings with respect to the child for whom foster care is being provided, but shall not include foster parents who are wholly or partially reimbursed by the state of Idaho for the care of the child.